Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.158

Disability history month—Activities.

Annually, during the month of October, each public school shall conduct or promote educational activities that provide instruction, awareness, and understanding of disability history and people with disabilities. The activities may include, but not be limited to, school assemblies or guest speaker presentations.

[ 2008 c 167 s 3.]

NOTES:

Short title—2008 c 167: "This act may be known and cited as the disability history month act." [ 2008 c 167 s 1.]

Findings—2008 c 167: "The legislature finds that annually recognizing disability history throughout our entire public educational system, from kindergarten through grade twelve and at our colleges and universities, during the month of October will help to increase awareness and understanding of the contributions that people with disabilities in our state, nation, and the world have made to our society. The legislature further finds that recognizing disability history will increase respect and promote acceptance and inclusion of people with disabilities. The legislature further finds that recognizing disability history will inspire students with disabilities to feel a greater sense of pride, reduce harassment and bullying, and help keep students with disabilities in school." [ 2008 c 167 s 2.]